Illinois, session 104th, SB2636.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Section 35 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/35)7    Sec. 35. Display of license; confiscation; violation as 8felony. 9    (a) Each video gaming terminal shall be licensed by the 10Board before placement or operation on the premises of a 11licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 12licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 13establishment, or licensed veterans establishment. The license 14of each video gaming terminal shall be maintained at the 15location where the video gaming terminal is operated. Failure 16to do so is a petty offense with a fine not to exceed $100. Any 17licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 18licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 19establishment, or licensed veterans establishment used for the 20conduct of gambling games in violation of this Act shall be 21considered a gambling place in violation of Section 28-3 of 22the Criminal Code of 2012. Every gambling device found in a 23licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment,   SB2636- 2 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 2establishment, or licensed veterans establishment operating 3gambling games in violation of this Act shall be subject to 4seizure, confiscation, and destruction as provided in Section 528-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any license issued under the 6Liquor Control Act of 1934 to any owner or operator of a 7licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 8licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9establishment, or licensed veterans establishment that 10operates or permits the operation of a video gaming terminal 11within its establishment in violation of this Act shall be 12immediately revoked. No person may own, operate, have in his 13or her possession or custody or under his or her control, or 14permit to be kept in any place under his or her possession or 15control, any device that awards credits and contains a 16circuit, meter, or switch capable of removing and recording 17the removal of credits when the award of credits is dependent 18upon chance. 19    Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to prohibit the 20use of a game device only if the game device is used in an 21activity that is not gambling under subsection (b) of Section 2228-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. An applicant or licensee 23under this Act is not in violation of this Act or any of the 24Illinois Gaming Board rules, specifically 11 Ill. Adm. Code 251800.420, and shall not be subject to disciplinary action, 26delay of any Board consideration, or denial of any license for   SB2636- 3 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1operating a game device if operation of the gaming device is in 2compliance with and not considered gambling under subsection 3(b) of Section 28-1 or paragraph (iii) of subsection (a) of 4Section 28-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 5    A violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. All 6devices that are owned, operated, or possessed in violation of 7this Section are hereby declared to be public nuisances and 8shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and destruction as 9provided in Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.10    The provisions of this Section do not apply to devices or 11electronic video game terminals licensed pursuant to this Act. 12A video gaming terminal operated for amusement only and 13bearing a valid amusement tax sticker shall not be subject to 14this Section until 30 days after the Board establishes that 15the central communications system is functional. 16    (b) (1) The odds of winning each video game shall be posted 17on or near each video gaming terminal. The manner in which the 18odds are calculated and how they are posted shall be 19determined by the Board by rule.20    (2) No video gaming terminal licensed under this Act may 21be played except during the legal hours of operation allowed 22for the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the licensed 23establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 24veterans establishment. A licensed establishment, licensed 25fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans establishment 26that violates this subsection is subject to termination of its   SB2636- 4 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1license by the Board. 2(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 3    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 4changing Sections 28-1 and 28-2 as follows and by adding 5Section 28-1.2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)7    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 8    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:9        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 10    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 11    subsection (b) of this Section;12        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 13    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 14    election;15        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 16    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 17    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;18        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 19    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 20    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 21    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 22    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 23    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 24    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting   SB2636- 5 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 2    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 3    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 4    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 5    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 6    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 7    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 8    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 9    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 10    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 11    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 12    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 13    of this paragraph (4);14        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument 15    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 16    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 17    money which he has received in the course of a bet or 18    wager;19        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 20    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 21    appointment or election;22        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 23    sells, offers to sell or transfers any ticket or share for 24    any lottery;25        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 26    sells, offers to sell or knowingly possesses or transfers   SB2636- 6 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    any policy ticket, slip, record, document or other similar 2    device;3        (9) knowingly drafts, prints or publishes any lottery 4    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 5    document or similar device, except for such activity 6    related to lotteries, bingo games and raffles authorized 7    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 8    or any other state or foreign government;9        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 10    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo games 11    and raffles authorized by and conducted in accordance with 12    the laws of Illinois or any other state;13        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 14    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 15    telegraph, radio, semaphore or similar means; or knowingly 16    installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or 17    receipt of such information; except that nothing in this 18    subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or receipt of such 19    information for use in news reporting of sporting events 20    or contests; or21        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 22    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 23    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 24    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 25    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 26    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not   SB2636- 7 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 2    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section. 3    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 4not be convicted of gambling:5        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 6    happening of chance including without limitation contracts 7    of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or accident 8    insurance.9        (2) Offers of prizes, award or compensation to the 10    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 11    determination of skill, speed, strength or endurance or to 12    the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such contest.13        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 14    this State.15        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 16    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 17    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 18    commerce to any place outside this State when such 19    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 20    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 21    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 22    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 23    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.24        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 25    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.26        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois   SB2636- 8 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 2    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 3    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 4    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.5        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 6    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 7    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 8    Illinois Lottery Law. 9        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 10    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 11    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 12    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 13    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.14        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 15    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.16        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 17    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 18    Act. 19        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 20    the Charitable Games Act.21        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 22    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.23        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 24    Gambling Act.25        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 26    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed   SB2636- 9 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 2    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 3    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 4        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 5    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 6    required to participate as provided for in Section 10 of 7    the Prizes and Gifts Act, except where participation in 8    such game of chance is accomplished using a gambling 9    device prohibited by paragraph (iii) of subsection (a) of 10    Section 28-2. 11        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 12    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 13    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 14    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 15    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 16    U.S.C. 1463). 17        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 18    the Sports Wagering Act. 19    (c) Sentence.20        (1) Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or 21    subsequent conviction under subsections (a)(3) through 22    (a)(12), is a Class 4 felony.23        (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 24    Section to the contrary, a gambling offense involving a 25    gambling device described in paragraph (iii) of subsection 26    (a) of Section 28-2 is a Class 4 felony.   SB2636- 10 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    (d) Circumstantial evidence.2    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 3shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 4prosecution.5(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 66-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 7101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    (720 ILCS 5/28-1.2 new)9    Sec. 28-1.2. Restrictions prohibited. No municipality 10shall impose any restriction or prohibition related to an 11activity which is lawful under subsection (b) of Section 28-1. 12    (720 ILCS 5/28-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-2)13    Sec. 28-2. Definitions. 14    (a) A "gambling device" is (i) any clock, tape machine, 15slot machine or other machines or device for the reception of 16money or other thing of value on chance or skill or upon the 17action of which money or other thing of value is staked, 18hazarded, bet, won, or lost; (ii) or any mechanism, furniture, 19fixture, equipment, or other device designed primarily for use 20in a gambling place; or (iii) any vending or other electronic 21machine or device, including, but not limited to, a machine or 22device that awards credits and contains a circuit, meter, or 23switch capable of removing and recording the removal of 24credits or that is connected directly or indirectly to the   SB2636- 11 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1Internet, either by cellular modem, hard wire, or wireless 2connection, or to a set of interconnected networked devices in 3order to participate in the game or contest or to receive or 4retrieve any data related to the device unless the connected 5device is a redemption vault or does not operate with a 6self-contained fill system, as defined in Section 10 and 7subsection (d) of Section 33 of the Prizes and Gifts Act, which 8permits the operation of the device solely determined on a fee 9basis or the amount of revenue generated but does not include a 10system based on time, number of spins or spin equivalent, or 11other non-revenue based system, and automatically ceases to 12operate upon the completion of a predetermined cycle and a 13route boost plus internal monitoring system, as defined in 14Section 10 of the Prizes and gifts Act, which is established 15and operated by the distributor. A "gambling device" does not 16include:17        (1) A coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device 18    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 19    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so 20    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 21    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the 22    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 23    property, or right to receive money or property.24        (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a 25    vending machine Vending machines by which full and 26    adequate return is made for the money invested and in   SB2636- 12 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    which there is no element of chance or hazard; or a device 2    as provided for in the Prizes and Gifts Act.3        (3) A crane game. For the purposes of this paragraph 4    (3), a "crane game" is an amusement device involving 5    skill, if it rewards the player exclusively with 6    merchandise contained within the amusement device proper 7    and limited to toys, novelties, and prizes other than 8    currency, each having a wholesale value which is not more 9    than $25.10        (4) A redemption machine. For the purposes of this 11    paragraph (4), a "redemption machine" is a single-player 12    or multi-player amusement device involving a game, the 13    object of which is throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting, 14    placing, or propelling a ball or other object that is 15    either physical or computer generated on a display or with 16    lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that 17    is either physical or computer generated on a display or 18    with lights, or stopping, by physical, mechanical, or 19    electronic means, a moving object that is either physical 20    or computer generated on a display or with lights into, 21    upon, or against a hole or other target that is either 22    physical or computer generated on a display or with 23    lights, provided that all of the following conditions are 24    met:25            (A) The outcome of the game is predominantly 26        determined by the skill of the player.  SB2636- 13 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1            (B) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 2        player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 3        upon the player's score.4            (C) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.5            (D) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu 6        of tickets or tokens for single play of the device does 7        not exceed $25.8            (E) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and 9        other representations of value, which may be 10        accumulated by players to redeem prizes of greater 11        value, for a single play of the device does not exceed 12        $25.13        (5) Video gaming terminals at a licensed 14    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 15    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 16    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment licensed 17    in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 18    (a-5) "Internet" means an interactive computer service or 19system or an information service, system, or access software 20provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple 21users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited 22to, an information service, system, or access software 23provider that provides access to a network system commonly 24known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and 25also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page, 26newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any   SB2636- 14 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1interactive computer service or system or other online 2service.3    (a-6) "Access" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 4Section 17-55.5    (a-7) "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 6Section 17-0.5. 7    (b) A "lottery" is any scheme or procedure whereby one or 8more prizes are distributed by chance among persons who have 9paid or promised consideration for a chance to win such 10prizes, whether such scheme or procedure is called a lottery, 11raffle, gift, sale, or some other name, excluding savings 12promotion raffles authorized under Section 5g of the Illinois 13Banking Act, Section 7008 of the Savings Bank Act, Section 1442.7 of the Illinois Credit Union Act, Section 5136B of the 15National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home 16Owners' Loan Act (12 U.S.C. 1463).17    (c) A "policy game" is any scheme or procedure whereby a 18person promises or guarantees by any instrument, bill, 19certificate, writing, token, or other device that any 20particular number, character, ticket, or certificate shall in 21the event of any contingency in the nature of a lottery entitle 22the purchaser or holder to receive money, property, or 23evidence of debt.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-87, eff. 1-1-20; 25102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB2636- 15 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1    Section 15. The Prizes and Gifts Act is amended by by 2changing Section 10 and by adding Sections 33 and 45 as 3follows: 4    (815 ILCS 525/10)5    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:6    "Bona fide product" means any item of real value, which 7may include gift certificates to be used for or towards the 8purchase of a retail item. "Bona fide product" does not 9include discount coupons, Internet access, a telephone card, a 10calling card, or a phone card. 11    "Catalog seller" means an entity (and its subsidiaries) or 12a person at least 50% of whose annual revenues are derived from 13the sale of products sold in connection with the distribution 14of catalogs of at least 24 pages, which contain written 15descriptions or illustrations and sale prices for each item of 16merchandise and which are distributed in more than one state 17with a total annual distribution of at least 250,000.18    "Discount coupon" means a coupon that has a value worth 19double the amount inserted into the electronic product 20promotion kiosk and is used to offset the price of a retail 21item at a store with a physical location or ecommerce website. 22    "No payment or purchase" means the process to participate 23in a prize and gift kiosk without inserting anything of value 24and limited to obtaining a code that will allow for free 25participation through the mail pursuant to instructions   SB2636- 16 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1contained within the prize and gift kiosk. 2    "Person" means a corporation, partnership, limited 3liability company, sole proprietorship, or natural person.4    "Prize" means a gift, award, or other item or service of 5value that is offered or awarded to a participant in a real or 6purported contest, competition, sweepstakes, scheme, plan, or 7other selection process that involves an element of chance.8    "Prize and gift kiosk" means a device used to promote the 9purchase of a bona fide product and offers or awards a prize, 10including cash, without requiring payment or purchase to 11participate in compliance with paragraph (12) of subsection 12(a) and paragraph (13) of subsection (b) of Section 28-1 of the 13Criminal Code of 2012, contains a fill system which permits 14the operation of the device solely determined on a fee basis or 15the amount of revenue generated but does not include a system 16based on time, number of spins or spin equivalent, or other 17non-revenue based system, and automatically ceases to operate 18upon the completion of a predetermined cycle, contains a route 19boost plus internal monitoring system that accounts and 20records (i) cash in, (ii) winnings, (iii) entries used, (iv) 21power failures, disconnections from the monitoring system, and 22malfunctions, and (v) remote activations and disabling. 23However, the monitoring system shall not be able to control or 24in any way alter the play of the prize and gift kiosk and shall 25not provide for the monitoring or reading of personal or 26financial information concerning patrons, and is not connected   SB2636- 17 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1directly or indirectly to the Internet, either by cellular 2modem, hard wire or wireless connection, or to a set of 3interconnected networked devices in order to participate in 4the game or contest or to receive or retrieve any data related 5to the device unless the connected device is a redemption 6vault that is for the sole purpose of redeeming a prize or 7award. 8    "Retail value" of a prize means: 9        (1) a price at which the sponsor can substantiate that 10    a substantial quantity of the item or service offered as a 11    prize has been sold to the public; or 12        (2) if the sponsor is unable to satisfy the 13    requirement in subdivision (1), no more than 3 times the 14    amount the sponsor paid for the prize in a bona fide 15    purchase from an unaffiliated seller.16    "Route boost plus" means an internal monitoring system 17that accounts and records (i) cash in, (ii) winnings, (iii) 18entries used, (iv) power failures, disconnections from the 19monitoring system, and malfunctions, and (v) remote 20activations and disabling. However, the monitoring system 21shall not be able to control or in any way alter the play of 22the prize and gift kiosk and shall not provide for the 23monitoring or reading of personal or financial information 24concerning patrons. 25    "Sponsor" means a person on whose behalf a promotion is 26conducted to promote or advertise goods, services, or property   SB2636- 18 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1of that person. "Sponsor" includes a person who conducts a 2promotion on behalf of another sponsor.3(Source: P.A. 92-436, eff. 1-1-02.) 4    (815 ILCS 525/33 new)5    Sec. 33. Prize and gift kiosk. 6    (a) It is unlawful for a person to operate on any premises 7a prize and gift kiosk that fails to meet the technical 8standard set forth in Section 10.9    (b) No prize and gift kiosk shall be connected directly or 10indirectly to the Internet, either by cellular modem, hard 11wire or wireless connection, or to a set of interconnected 12networked devices in order to participate in the game or 13contest or to receive or retrieve any data related to the kiosk 14or device unless the connected device is a redemption vault.15    (c) It is unlawful for a prize and gift kiosk to offer the 16sale of anything other than a bona fide product.17    (d) It is unlawful to operate a prize and gift kiosk 18without a self contained fill system which permits the 19operation of the device solely determined on a fee basis or the 20amount of revenue generated but does not include a system 21based on time, number of spins or spin equivalent, or other 22non-revenue based system, and automatically ceases to operate 23upon the completion of a predetermined cycle.24    (e) It is unlawful to operate a prize and gift kiosk 25without a route boost plus internal monitoring system that   SB2636- 19 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1accounts and records (i) cash in, (ii) winnings, (iii) entries 2used, (iv) power failures, disconnections from the monitoring 3system, and malfunctions, and (v) remote activations and 4disabling. However, the monitoring system shall not be able to 5control or in any way alter the play of the prize and gift 6kiosk and shall not provide for the monitoring or reading of 7personal or financial information concerning patrons.8    (f) It is unlawful for a prize and gift kiosk to offer no 9payment or purchase options other than provided for in Section 1010. 11    (815 ILCS 525/45 new)12    Sec. 45. Fee. A prize and gift kiosk shall be registered 13with the Department of Revenue and shall remit the annual fee 14as set by the Department of Revenue. Filing for a device other 15than a prize and gift kiosk shall be deemed a violation of 16filing a false report or form with the State. Violators shall 17be subject to any and all penalties for such violation, 18including, but not limited to, the seizure of the device. The 19Department of Revenue and the Illinois Liquor Control 20Commission or its designee, including any public or private 21task force, shall have jurisdiction. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.  SB2636- 20 -LRB104 12693 LNS 23531 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    230 ILCS 40/354    720 ILCS 5/28-1from Ch. 38, par. 28-15    720 ILCS 5/28-1.2 new6    720 ILCS 5/28-2from Ch. 38, par. 28-27    815 ILCS 525/108    815 ILCS 525/33 new9    815 ILCS 525/45 new